Utah statutes.
53A-24-109.   Delegation of duties and responsibilities of the office.
The executive director may, in accordance with applicable law and regulations
and with the consent of the executive officer of the board, delegate duties
and responsibilities of the office to one or more of its divisions to enable
the office to better serve individuals' disabilities and to increase the
efficiency and effectiveness of operations.
